Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.150

Uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, shall govern the issuance and denial of certificates, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons certified under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 243 s 15.]